Utah statutes.
41-22-35.   Off-highway vehicle user fee -- Decal -- Agents -- Penalty for fraudulent issuance of decal -- Deposit and use of fee revenue.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), any person owning or operating a nonresident off-highway vehicle who operates or gives another person permission to operate the nonresident off-highway vehicle on any public land, trail, street, or highway in this state shall:

(i)  apply for an off-highway vehicle decal issued exclusively for an off-highway vehicle owned by a nonresident of the state;

(ii)  pay an annual off-highway vehicle user fee; and

(iii)  provide evidence that the owner is a nonresident.

(b)  The provisions of Subsection (1)(a) do not apply to an off-highway vehicle if the off-highway vehicle is:

(i)  registered in another state that offers reciprocal operating privileges to Utah residents under rules made by the board;

(ii)  used exclusively for the purposes of a scheduled competitive event sponsored by a public or private entity or another event sponsored by a governmental entity under rules made by the board;

(iii)  owned and operated by a state government agency and the operation of the off-highway vehicle within the boundaries of the state is within the course and scope of the duties of the agency; or

(iv)  used exclusively for the purpose of an off-highway vehicle manufacturer sponsored event within the state under rules made by the board.

(2)  The off-highway vehicle user fee is $30.

(3)  Upon compliance with the provisions of Subsection (1)(a), the nonresident shall:

(a)  receive a nonresident off-highway vehicle user decal indicating compliance with the provisions of Subsection (1)(a); and

(b)  display the decal on the off-highway vehicle in accordance with rules made by the board.

(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board shall make rules establishing:

(a)  procedures for:

(i)  the payment of off-highway vehicle user fees; and

(ii)  the display of a decal on an off-highway vehicle as required under Subsection (3)(b);

(b)  acceptable evidence indicating compliance with Subsection (1);

(c)  eligibility requirements for reciprocal operating privileges for nonresident users; 

(d)  eligibility for scheduled competitive events or other events under Subsection (1)(b)(ii); and

(e)  eligibility for an off-highway vehicle manufacturer sponsored event under Subsection (1)(b)(iv).

(5) (a)  An off-highway vehicle user decal may be issued and the off-highway vehicle user fee may be collected by the division or agents of the division.

(b)  An agent shall retain 10% of all off-highway vehicle user fees collected.

(c)  The division may require agents to obtain a bond in a reasonable amount.

(d)  On or before the tenth day of each month, each agent shall:

(i)  report all sales to the division; and

(ii)  submit all off-highway vehicle user fees collected less the remuneration provided in Subsection (5)(b).

(e) (i)  If an agent fails to pay the amount due, the division may assess a penalty of 20% of the amount due.

(ii)  Delinquent payments shall bear interest at the rate of 1% per month.

(iii)  If the amount due is not paid because of bad faith or fraud, the division shall assess a penalty of 100% of the total amount due together with interest.

(f)  All fees collected by an agent, except the remuneration provided in Subsection (5)(b), shall:

(i)  be kept separate and apart from the private funds of the agent; and

(ii)  belong to the state.

(g)  An agent may not issue an off-highway vehicle user decal to any person unless the person furnishes evidence of compliance with the provisions of Subsection (1)(a).

(h)  A violation of any provision of this Subsection (5) is a class B misdemeanor and may be cause for revocation of the agent authorization.

(6)  Revenue generated by off-highway vehicle user fees shall be deposited in the Off-highway Vehicle Account created in Section 41-22-19.



Amended by Chapter 332, 2013 General Session

